Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 4.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201079-252
Pupils; health inspections; employment
of physicians authorized.

In
lieu of conducting the inspections required by section 79-248, the board
of education or school board of any school district may employ regularly licensed
physicians to make such
inspections.

Laws 1919, c. 241, § 5, p. 1005;

C.S.1922, § 6540;

C.S.1929, § 79-2117;

R.S.1943, § 79-2126;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 175, p. 749;

Laws 1967, c. 538, § 4, p. 1779;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,137;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 56;

Laws 2010, LB713, § 4.
July 15, 2010